Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Outdoor Lighting

§ 37-16-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Electric utility” means any electrical company or electric cooperative that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state;

“Lighting apparatus” means any shield, cover or other device used with or on a lamp.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 3, § 1.

§ 37-16-202.
Tariffs for outdoor lighting.

All electric utilities shall offer tariffs for utility provided outdoor lighting that provide an option for all electric customers to choose lighting apparatus designed to minimize light illuminating unintended areas and maintain dark skies. Rates for these lighting apparatus shall not be subsidized by revenue from other utility provided services. The commission shall have jurisdiction over the tariffs.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 3, § 1.